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DTC P0500/42 Vehicle Speed Sensor Malfunction
(No.1 SpeedSensor)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The speed sensor detects the rotation speed of the transmission output shaft and sends signals to the En-
gineandECTECU(2UZ −FE, 1FZ−FE)orECTECU( 1HZ, 1HD−T, 1HD−FTE).TheEngineandECTECU
(2UZ−FE, 1FZ−FE)orECTECU( 1HZ, 1HD−T, 1HD−FTE)determines thevehiclespeedbasedon these
signals. An AC voltage is generated in the vehicle speed sensor coil as the rotor mounted on the output shaft
rotates,and thisvoltage issent to theEngineandECTECU(2UZ −FE, 1FZ−FE)orECTECU( 1HZ, 1HD−T,
1HD−FTE).

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0500/42

All conditions below are detected 500 times or more continu-
ously.
(2 trip detection logic)
(a)Nosignal fromNo. 1 speedsensor is input toEngineand
ECT ECU or ECT ECU while 72 pulueses of No.2 speed sen-
sorsignal issent (Transfershift leverother thanLposition).
(b)Nosignal fromNo. 1 speedsensor is input toEngineand
ECTECUorECTECUwhile 180pulesesofNo.2speedsen-
sor signal is sent (Transfer shift lever L position).
(c)Vehiclespeed:5km/h (3mph)ormore forat least4se-
conds.
(d) Neutral start switch: OFF (Other than P or N range)
(e) T/R: Other than N position

SOpenorshort inNo. 1 speedsensorcircuit
SNo.1 speedsensor
SEngineandECTECU(2UZ −FE, 1FZ−FE)

SECTECU( 1HZ, 1HD−T, 1HD−FTE)
SAutomatic transmissionassembly

Clutch or brake slips or gear broken
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze frame data using hand−held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ning or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air−fuel ratio lean or rich, etc. at the time of the malfunction.

1 Connect hand−held tester and read value of vehicle speed value.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Start the engine and the hand−held tester main switch ON.
CHECK:
Drive the vehicle and read vehicle speed value.
OK:

Vehicle speed matches tester speed value

NG Check and replace Engine and ECT ECU or ECT
ECU (See page IN−35).

OK

2 Check speedometer circuit (See page BE−2) .

NG Repair or replace speedometer circuit.

OK
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3 Check resistance between terminal SPD of Engine and ECT ECU or terminal SP1
of ECT ECU connector and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door

(See page BO−1 27).
(b) Disconnect the cruise control ECU connector.
(c) Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU or

ECT ECU.
(d) Shift the shift lever to neutral.
(e) Jack up the rear wheel on one side.
(f) Turn ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Check voltage between terminals SPD of the Engine and ECT
ECUor terminalSP 1 of theECTECUconnectorandbody
groune when the wheel is turned slowly.
OK:

Voltage is generated intermittently
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NG Check and repair harness and connector be-
tween combination meter and Engine and ECT
ECU or ECT ECU (See page IN−35).

OK

Check and replace Engine and ECT ECU or
ECT ECU (See page IN−35).


